Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 3 Town Forests, Parks, and Recreation Systems

32-3-1.
Local regulations — Prosecution of violations.

Town councils and city councils may pass such ordinances, bylaws, and regulations as they may think proper in relation to the care, management, and use of the public parks, squares, or grounds within the limits of their respective towns or cities, and may prescribe punishment for the violation thereof by a fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or by imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days for each offense. Every deputy sheriff, town sergeant, town constable, or police officer, or any officer authorized to serve criminal process, may arrest, without a warrant, any person who does any criminal act or willfully violates any of those ordinances, bylaws, or regulations in any of those public parks, squares, or grounds, and may detain that person until a complaint can be made against him or her, and he or she can be taken upon a warrant issued upon that complaint; provided, that the arrest and detention without a warrant shall not continue longer than the space of six (6) hours when the arrest is made between the hours of 4 o’clock in the morning (4:00 a.m.) and 8 o’clock in the evening (8:00 p.m.), and when made at any other hour, the person arrested shall not be detained after 10 o’clock in the morning (10:00 a.m.) of the following day.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 25; P.L. 1913, ch. 950, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-1

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 62; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 33; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 33.

32-3-2.
Establishment of public recreation systems.

The city council of any city or the town council of any town may vote to establish a system of public recreation and may, by ordinance or resolution, vest in the school committee, the board in control of public parks, a board of recreation established as provided for in this chapter, the authority to establish, construct, equip, control, and maintain public playgrounds, athletic fields, swimming pools, bathing places, and other community recreation centers, and to conduct and promote recreation, play, sport, and physical training for which admission or other fees may be charged.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 24; P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-2

.

32-3-3.
Powers of agency in charge of system.

The board or committee that may be authorized pursuant to §

32-3-2

to exercise those powers stated therein may conduct its activities on land and in buildings, adapted or adaptable for those purposes, owned by the city or town, with the consent of the committee or board in control of that property, or on land or in buildings that may hereafter be acquired for those purposes by gift, purchase, or lease; and may also in its discretion take charge of and use any place or places that any person or persons may offer the use of for purposes herein enumerated. The board or committee may employ a superintendent of recreation, teachers, and other officers and may fix their compensation. The board or committee may authorize the use of such property as may be under its control for any other municipal purpose, or by any person, society, or other organization for such other public, recreational, social, or educational purposes as the board or committee may deem proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 24; P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 53.

32-3-4.
Board of recreation.

If a city council or town council shall vote to establish a board of recreation, the city council or town council shall, by ordinance or resolution, specify the number of members on the board of recreation, the manner of their appointment, and the term for which they are chosen, and may provide that a member of the school committee, the city council, or town council, and the board in control of public parks in that city or town shall be ex officio members of the board of recreation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 24; P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-4

.

32-3-5.
Joint recreational committees.

The respective boards or committees of two (2) or more towns or cities, exercising the powers conferred by §§

32-3-2

—

32-3-6

, may vote to unite as a joint committee for the purpose of employing a superintendent of recreation, teachers, supervisors, and other officers; may fix their compensation; and shall apportion the amount to be paid by each of the towns on the basis of the next preceding federal census. The joint committee shall be the agent of each town represented thereon.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 47, § 24; P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-5

.

32-3-6.
Appropriations for recreation systems.

Any city or town may appropriate money for:

The acquisition by lease or purchase, or for the equipment, of land or buildings for the purposes enumerated in §§

32-3-2

—

32-3-5

;

The operation of playgrounds and recreation places; and

The carrying on of recreation activities.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 47, § 24; P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-6

.

32-3-7.
Special laws unaffected.

The provisions of §§

32-3-2

—

32-3-6

shall not affect the provisions of any special law respecting any particular city or town, none of which are repealed hereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1924, ch. 553, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-7

.

32-3-8.
Town forests.

Towns may appropriate sums of money for the purpose of acquiring certain lands to be set apart as town forests and may expend money for developing and planting those town forests and for the necessary nursery stock required for planting purposes, provided, that the expenditures shall be authorized by the town at a legal town meeting in accordance with law. Towns may also acquire, by gift or bequest, lands for town forests and may reclaim and plant those lands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 47, § 27; P.L. 1929, ch. 1389, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1617, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-8

.

32-3-9.
Town forest and park commissions.

The town council of any town is hereby authorized to appoint five (5) persons who shall constitute the forest and park commission of that town, to serve for a term of one, two (2), three (3), four (4), and five (5) years, respectively. Annually thereafter, at the meeting held for the purpose of appointments of town officers, any town council shall appoint one member of the commission to replace the member whose term shall next expire and who shall serve for a term of five (5) years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. In case of vacancy in the commission, the town council shall fill the vacancy forthwith by appointment for the unexpired term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3349, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-9

.

32-3-10.
Supervision of parks and forests — Plans and recommendations.

A town forest and park commission shall have supervision and control of all the forests acquired by that town under the provisions of §

32-3-8

, or which may be otherwise acquired, and of the public parks of that town. The commission shall, from time to time, make such recommendations and submit such plans to the town council of the town as to the commission shall seem proper relative to the improvement and beautifying of the public parks and places in the town, to the preservation of objects and places of especial interest therein, whether owing to their natural attractiveness, their historical associations, or otherwise, and relative to the general development and enhancement of the natural beauties of the town, its surroundings and approaches, and shall annually make a written report of its administration to the financial town meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3349, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-10

.

32-3-11.
Reforestation projects.

A town forest and park commission shall also have jurisdiction over forest management projects and the reforestation of any land owned by that town and shall provide for that reforestation and may cooperate with the state in reforestation of any rural lands within that town under such terms as may be deemed to be for the public benefit of that town and with the approval of the town council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3349, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-11

.

32-3-12.
Expenses and appropriations for commissions.

The members of any town forest and park commission shall serve without compensation. They shall have no authority to spend any money or to contract any indebtedness for, or on account of, the town, other than such moneys as shall be appropriated and placed at their disposal for the purposes aforesaid, or such indebtedness as they may be especially authorized to incur by the town at some regularly called meeting of the electors thereof who are entitled to vote upon any proposition to impose a tax.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3349, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

32-3-12

.